Mississippi statutes. Title 5. Legislative Department
General Legislative Investigating Committee

§§ 5-3-1 through 5-3-25.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1973, ch. 331, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 1973).

§5-3-1. [Codes, 1942, § 3365-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 281, § 1]

§5-3-3. [Codes, 1942, § 3365-02; Laws, 1946, ch. 281, § 2]

§5-3-5. [Codes, 1942, § 3365-03; Laws, 1946, ch. 281, § 3; Laws, 1960, ch. 388; Laws, 1962, ch. 494, § 1]

§5-3-7. [Codes, 1942, § 3365-04; Laws, 1946, ch. 281, § 4]

§5-3-9. [Codes, 1942, § 3365-09; Laws, 1946, ch. 281, § 9]

§5-3-11. [Codes, 1942, § 3365-10; Laws, 1946, ch. 281, § 10]

§5-3-13. [Codes, 1942, § 3365-05; Laws, 1946, ch. 281, § 5]

§5-3-15. [Codes, 1942, § 3365-07; Laws, 1946, ch. 281, § 7; Laws, 1962, ch. 494, § 2]

§5-3-17. [Codes, 1942, § 3365-06; Laws, 1946, ch. 281, § 6]

§5-3-19. [Codes, 1942, § 3365-08; Laws, 1946 ch. 281, § 8]

§5-3-21. [Codes, 1942, § 3365-11; Laws, 1946, ch. 281, § 11; Laws, 1958, ch. 472; Laws, 1964, ch. 493]

§5-3-23. [Codes, 1942, § 3365-12; Laws, 1946, ch. 281, § 12; Laws, 1960, ch. 387]

§5-3-25. [Codes, 1942, § 3365-13; Laws, 1946, ch. 281, § 13]

§§ 5-3-27 through 5-3-31.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 402, § 16, effective July 1, 2017.

§5-3-27. [Laws,1950, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1950).]

§5-3-29. [Laws,1950, ch. 463, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1950).]

§5-3-31. [Laws,1950, ch. 463, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1950).]